District of Columbia statutes.
37-201.16

Substitutes for dry measure prohibited.

Nothing in this subchapter contained shall be construed as permitting the use as a dry measure or substituting for a dry measure any of the following containers: barrels, boxes, lug boxes, crates, hampers, baskets, or climax baskets; and the use of any such container as a measure is hereby expressly prohibited, and the user shall be fined or imprisoned as herein provided for other violations of this subchapter.

Mar. 3, 1921, 41 Stat. 1223, ch. 118, § 16
1981 Ed., § 10-117.
1973 Ed., § 10-116.